Utah statutes.
40-6-19.   Bond and Surety Forfeiture Trust Fund created -- Contents -- Use
of fund money.
(1)  There is created a private-purpose trust fund known as the "Bond and
Surety Forfeiture Trust Fund."
(2)  Money collected by the Division of Oil, Gas, and Mining as a result of
bond or surety forfeitures shall be deposited in the fund.
(3)  Interest earned on money in the fund shall accrue to the fund.
(4) (a)  Money from each forfeited bond or surety, together with interest,
shall be used by the Division of Oil, Gas, and Mining to accomplish the
requisite performance standards under the program to which the forfeited bond
or surety corresponds.
(b)  Any money not used for a project shall be returned to the rightful
claimant.
